Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2889
Delegated dispensing permit; advisory
committees; authorized.

The board
may appoint formulary advisory committees as deemed necessary for the determination
of formularies for delegated dispensing permittees.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 469;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 82;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 63;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.59;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 354;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 985;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 7.